Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.157, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Commissioner's powers and duties. The commissioner of natural resources, on behalf of the state of Minnesota, shall take all actions, by rule or otherwise, necessary to carry out the duties and obligations of the state of Minnesota arising from the Memorandum of Agreementnew text begin , as amendednew text end . Powers and duties provided by this subdivision apply to payment of money under the Memorandum of Agreement only to the extent and to the amount specifically appropriated by the legislature to carry out the terms of the Memorandum of Agreement. Sec. 2. new text begin [97B.202] TREATY OPEN SEASONS. new text end new text begin If the commissioner does not establish an open season for taking a species of big game, a Chippewa Band identified in section 97A.157, subdivision 1, may establish an open season, independently of the state, for members of the band to take the species. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 1854 TREATY AREA PAYMENTS.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for proportional payments to Tribes receiving payments under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.157. The commissioner must work with the signatory Tribes to update and amend the affected agreement. new text end